Utah statutes.
20A-3-307.   Processing of absentee ballot.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), upon receipt of an envelope containing an absentee ballot, the election officer shall:

(a)  enclose the unopened envelope containing the absentee ballot and the written application of the absentee voter in a larger envelope;

(b)  seal that envelope and endorse it with:

(i)  the name or number of the proper voting precinct;

(ii)  the name and official title of the election officer; and

(iii)  the words "This envelope contains an absentee ballot and may only be opened on election day at the polls while the polls are open."; and

(c)  safely keep the envelope in his office until it is delivered by him to the proper election judges.

(2)  If the election officer receives envelopes containing absentee ballots too late to transmit them to the election judges on election day, the election officer shall retain those absentee ballots in a safe and secure place until they can be processed as provided in Section 20A-3-309.

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c), when reasonably possible, the election officer shall deliver or mail valid absentee ballots to the appropriate voting precinct election judges so that they may be processed at the voting precinct on election day.

(b)  If the election officer is unable to determine the voting precinct to which an absentee ballot should be sent, or if a valid absentee ballot is received too late for delivery on election day to election judges, the election officer shall retain the absentee ballot in a safe place until it can be processed as required by Section 20A-3-309.

(c)  When the absentee ballots will be centrally counted, the election officer shall deliver those absentee ballots to the counting center on election day for counting.

